Washington statutes.
RCW 2.36.180

Demographic data—Collection—Reports.

The administrative office of the courts shall provide all courts with a method to collect data on a juror's race, ethnicity, age, sex, employment status, educational attainment, and income, as well as any other data approved by order of the chief justice of the Washington state supreme court. Data collection must be conducted and reported in a manner that preserves juror anonymity. The administrative office of the courts shall publish this demographic data in an annual report to the governor.

[ 2023 c 316 s 1.]